Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.903

Effective dates—1994 c 33.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 21, 1994], except section 5 of this act which shall take effect June 1, 1994.

[ 1994 c 33 s 29.]